New York, session 2025-2026, A11307.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "golden age hearing access act". 3 § 2. Section 798 of the general business law is amended by adding ten 4 new subdivisions 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, and 30 to read as 5 follows: 6 21. All hearing aid dispensers shall offer products to persons ages 7 sixty-two and older at prices reflecting the best available terms under 8 most-favored nation pricing agreements with manufacturers. 9 (a) "Most-favored nation pricing" shall mean contractual terms requir- 10 ing hearing aid manufacturers doing business in New York state to offer 11 their best pricing to persons ages sixty-two and older, ensuring they 12 receive the lowest available prices. 13 (b) Manufacturers shall certify annually to the secretary compliance 14 with most-favored nation pricing provisions. 15 (c) Dispensers and manufacturers shall disclose pricing and cost 16 structures to the division of consumer protection for public review. 17 Proprietary information shall remain confidential, but summary data 18 shall be published for persons ages sixty-two and older's awareness. 19 (d) A fine of up to ten thousand dollars per violation for manufactur- 20 ers or dispensers found in breach of most-favored nation pricing 21 provisions. Suspension or revocation of licenses for repeat offenders. 22 22. Hearing aid dispensers may utilize third-party services for 23 audiometric testing, provided the third-party complies with state stand- 24 ards. Dispensers shall disclose to persons ages sixty-two and older the 25 option to seek independent audiometric testing. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15762-01-6 A. 11307 2 1 23. A regulatory sandbox shall allow hearing aid dispensers to pilot 2 innovative service models with safeguards for persons ages sixty-two and 3 older, resulting in a reduction of bureaucratic requirements for entry- 4 level dispensers to encourage competition. 5 24. Hearing aid dispensers may use telehealth platforms for consulta- 6 tions and fittings, provided they comply with privacy standards. 7 Persons ages sixty-two and older shall be informed of telehealth options 8 and in-person alternatives. 9 25. The requirement for a physical office location for dispensers 10 shall be reviewed biennially and repealed if deemed unnecessary due to 11 advances in telehealth. 12 26. The division of consumer protection shall maintain a public data- 13 base of dispensers and their compliance records. A "Hearing Aid Consumer 14 Rights Handbook" shall be distributed to all prospective users ages 15 sixty-two and older, outlining their rights under state law. 16 27. Hearing aid dispensers and manufacturers implementing cost-reduc- 17 tion programs for persons ages sixty-two and older will qualify for 18 state tax credits equivalent to five percent of their program expendi- 19 tures, capped at one million dollars annually per entity. 20 28. Persons ages sixty-two and older purchasing hearing aids may claim 21 a state income tax deduction of up to two thousand five hundred dollars 22 annually per hearing aid device. 23 29. A five million dollar annual grant program shall be established 24 for small businesses developing innovative hearing aid technologies. 25 Priority shall be given to proposals that demonstrate scalability, tech- 26 nological innovation, reliance on New York state economy, and cost 27 reductions for persons ages sixty-two and older. 28 30. The secretary shall submit an annual report to the governor and 29 the legislature on the effectiveness of the reforms, including compli- 30 ance rates, cost savings, and persons ages sixty-two and older satisfac- 31 tion metrics. 32 § 3. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdi- 33 vision, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 34 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgement shall not affect, 35 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 36 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 37 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such 38 judgement shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the 39 intent of the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if 40 such invalid provisions has not been included. 41 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.